Hawaii statutes.
§435E-29 Termination. The
interindemnity arrangement, and the reserve trust fund incident thereto, shall
be subject to termination at any time by the vote or written consent of not
less than three-fourths of the participating members. [L 1977, c 182, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next